Hawaii, session 2026, HB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hanalei Bay is known for its character as a quiet recreational area for families and visitors to participate in ocean activities, including surfing, swimming, paddle boarding, sailing, and kayaking. The legislature further finds that there has been a growing increase in the number of large vessels, including yachts and ships, mooring in Hanalei Bay, posing a risk to the health and safety of individuals and families participating in ocean activities in the bay. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to preserve the quiet recreational character of Hanalei Bay and protect the safety of residents and visitors who use the bay for water activities by restricting the size of vessels permitted to enter Hanalei Bay and requiring the board of land and natural resources to define the boundaries of Hanalei Bay by rule. SECTION 2.  Chapter 200, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§200-     Hanalei Bay; vessel restrictions.  No vessel more than seventy-five feet in length shall enter Hanalei Bay waters, the boundaries of which shall be defined by the board in rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91; provided that this section shall not apply to vessels operated by a federal, state, or county agency." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July, 1, 3000.